District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0443.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this act may
58 be cited as the “DC Water Billing and Disconnection Modernization Amendment Act of 2025”.
59 Sec. 2. The District of Columbia Public Works Act of 1954, effective May 18, 1954 (68 Stat. 101;
60 D.C. Official Code § 34-2301 et seq.), is amended as follows:
61 (a) Section 1801 (D.C. Official Code § 34–2301) is amended to read as follows:
62 “(1) “Authority” or “DC Water” means the District of Columbia Water and Sewer
63 Authority.
64 “(2) “Owner” means any individual, corporation, association, or partnership listed as the
65 legal titleholder of record for any real property located in the District.
66 “(3) “Owner-occupant” means the owner of a residential unit that serves as the owner’s
67 primary residence and is located within a multi-unit building that is managed by a unit owners’ association.
68 “(4) “Rental payment” means any monetary payment or other form of consideration
69 transferred from a tenant to an owner for the occupation or use of a unit within a rental property.
70 “(5) “Rental property” means any real property consisting of one or more residential units
71 that are being rented, leased, or subleased to any person other than the owner.
72 “(6) “Responsible party” means:
73 “(A) Any owner of a rental unit that receives the bill for water and sewer service
74 for a rental property they own in their name or the name of their agent; or
75 “(B) Any owner-occupant or tenant that receives the bill for water and sewer
76 service in their own name as described in section 1803.
2

77 “(7) “Tenant” means any person who is entitled to the possession, occupancy, or the
78 benefits of any rental property in exchange for rental payments.
79 “(8) “Unit owners’ association” means any condominium association, community
80 association, unit owners’ association, or any other common interest development that manages a multi-unit
81 building in which owner-occupants separately own individual units.”.
82 (b) New section 1802a (D.C. Official Code § 34–2302) is amended as follows:
83 “Sec. 1802a. 2026 Amnesty program.
84 “(a)(1) DC Water shall establish an Amnesty Program (“Program”) for any responsible party that
85 is liable for delinquent water and sanitary sewer services.
86 “(2) DC Water shall, through the Program:
87 “(A) Waive all fees or interest assessed against a responsible party for late
88 payments if the responsible party pays off all other outstanding charges for water and sanitary sewer
89 services;
90 “(B) Waive a portion of the responsible party’s outstanding balance if the
91 responsible party enters into a payment plan with DC Water; or
92 “(C) Waive a portion of an owner’s outstanding balance for any expenditures made
93 by the owner to improve water service, including expenditures to repair a leak or to sub-meter units in the
94 property.
95 “(b) DC Water shall conduct a continuous public awareness campaign regarding the Program from
96 September 1, 2026 through December 15, 2026.
97 “(c) DC Water shall accept applications to the Program from October 1, 2026, through December
98 31, 2026.”.
99 (c) Section 1803 (D.C. Official Code § 34–2303) is amended to read as follows:
100 “Sec. 1803. Right of tenant or owner-occupant to receive water and sewer service in their own
101 name; payment owed by owner-occupant or tenant.
3

102 “(a)(1) If an owner of a rental property or their agent is billed directly by DC Water for water and
103 sewer services provided to a rental property, and the owner or agent’s account is deemed delinquent
104 pursuant to section 103(c), any tenant residing in that rental property may enter into an agreement with DC
105 Water to have water and sewer service continued or resumed in the tenant’s own name as described in this
106 section.
107 “(2) For tenants who wish to receive service in their name pursuant to paragraph (1) of this
108 section and who reside in a master-metered rental property in which tenants’ water and sewer usage cannot
109 otherwise be determined, DC Water shall either:
110 “(A) Enter into an agreement with the owner or their agent to sub-meter each unit
111 in the rental property and:
112 “(i) Continue or resume service in the owner or their agent’s name
113 pursuant to a payment plan; or
114 “(ii) Continue or resume service in the name of any individual tenant who
115 agrees to have water and sewer service continued in their own name as described in this section;
116 “(B) Enter into an agreement with a tenant association representing tenants in the
117 rental property, if that tenant association has voted to continue or resume service in the tenant association’s
118 name; or
119 “(C) Enter into direct agreements with tenants to continue or resume service in
120 their name, provided that tenants representing at least 70% of occupied units in the building agree to
121 continue or resume service.
122 “(3) If a unit owners’ association or their agent is billed directly by DC Water for water
123 and sewer services to a multi-unit building, and the unit owners’ association’s account is deemed delinquent
124 pursuant to section 103(c), any owner-occupant residing in that multi-unit building unit may enter into an
125 agreement with DC Water to have water and sewer service continued or resumed in the owner-occupant’s
126 own name as described in this section.
4

127 “(4) For owner-occupants who wish to receive service in their name pursuant to paragraph
128 (3) of this subsection and who reside in a master-metered rental property in which owner-occupants’ water
129 and sewer usage cannot otherwise be determined, DC Water shall either:
130 “(A) Enter into an agreement with the unit owner’s association or their agent to
131 sub-meter each unit in the rental property and:
132 “(i) Continue or resume service in the unit owner’s association’s name
133 pursuant to a payment plan; or
134 “(ii) Continue or resume service in the name of any individual owner-
135 occupant who agrees to have water and sewer service continued in their own name as described in this
136 section;
137 “(B) Enter into direct agreements with owner-occupants to continue or resume
138 service in their name, provided that owner-occupants representing at least 70% of units in the building agree
139 to continue or resume service.
140 “(b)(1) DC Water shall enter into an agreement with a tenant or owner-occupant to continue or
141 resume water service in the tenant or owner-occupant’s name upon request of the tenant or owner-occupant.
142 “(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, DC Water may refuse to enter into
143 an agreement with any tenant or owner-occupant whose account, while under a prior agreement to receive
144 service in their name, was deemed delinquent within the last six months.
145 “(3) An owner shall not prohibit a tenant or owner-occupant from entering into an
146 agreement with DC Water to have water and sewer service in the tenant or owner-occupant’s name,
147 provided the tenant or owner-occupant is otherwise eligible to do so.
148 “(c) If a tenant, tenant association, or owner-occupant enters into an agreement to receive water
149 and sewer service in their own name pursuant to subsection (a) of this section:
150 “(1) DC Water shall establish a new account for the tenant, tenant association, or owner-
151 occupant, through which DC Water will provide the tenant, tenant association, or owner-occupant with a
5

152 receipt of all payments made to DC Water and to which the tenant, tenant association and owner-occupant
153 will maintain access after they vacate the rental property or service is returned to the owner’s name;
154 “(2) DC Water shall not disconnect service, or shall resume service that was previously
155 disconnected due to the owner’s delinquency, unless the tenant, tenant association, or owner-occupant fails
156 to comply with the terms of the agreement and DC Water complies with section 103 of this act;
157 “(3) DC Water, the owner, and the unit owner’s association shall not require a tenant or
158 owner-occupant to assume liability for any charges or fees billed to the owner or unit owners’ association
159 for any period of service prior to when the tenant or owner-occupant entered into an agreement to have
160 service continued or resumed in tenant or owner-occupant’s name;
161 “(4) For any rental property or multi-unit buildings that is master-metered and for which a
162 tenants’ or owner-occupants’ water usage cannot be determined, DC Water shall not require a tenant to pay
163 more than the total water and sewer service bill divided by the number of occupied units at the time of the
164 proposed shut-off for any period of service for which the tenant or owner-occupant is being billed.
165 “(5) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the tenant may withhold the amount paid
166 to DC Water for the cost of such service from any rental payment due to the owner, unit owners’ association,
167 or their agent, except when the cost of such service has already been deducted from the rental payment
168 owed for the same time period.
169 “(d) If a tenant does not enter into an agreement with DC Water to receive service in their own
170 name, DC Water may commence termination procedures, provided that DC Water complies with section
171 103 of this act.
172 “(e) Nothing in this section shall prevent the Mayor or the Attorney General from pursuing any
173 other appropriate action or remedy at law or equity against an owner, agent, lessor, manager, or tenant of a
174 rental property.”.
175 (d) New section 1803a is added to read as follows:
176 “Sec. 1803a. Customer incentive programs.
6

177 “(a) DC Water shall launch incentive programs through which it may offer responsible parties a
178 discount, in an amount to be determined by DC Water, if the responsible party:
179 “(1) Enrolls in an automatic payment program through which the amount due to DC Water
180 for a responsible party’s most recent bill is automatically charged to, debited from, or otherwise transferred
181 from a banking or credit account owned or controlled by the responsible party; or
182 “(2) Enters into an agreement with DC Water establishing a third-party guarantor that assumes
183 liability for any payment owed to DC Water by the responsible party if their account is deemed delinquent
184 pursuant to section 103(c).”.
185 (e) Section 1804 (D.C. Official Code § 34-2304) is amended to read follows:
186 “(a) If the account belonging to the owner of a rental property is deemed delinquent, DC Water or
187 any tenant residing in that rental property may petition the Superior Court of the District of Columbia
188 (“Court”) for the appointment of a receiver.
189 “(b)(1)(A) The Chief Judge of the Superior Court, or their designee, upon receipt of a petition that
190 makes a prima facie showing that an owner’s account is delinquent, shall immediately issue an order
191 requiring such owner or their agent to show cause why a receiver should not be appointed.
192 “(B) For the purposes of this section, a copy of the notice provided to tenants
193 indicating that an owner account has been deemed delinquent, as described in section 103(c)(2) shall
194 constitute a prima facie showing that an owner’s account is delinquent.
195 “(2) The order of the Court, together with a copy of the verified petition:
196 “(A) Shall be served on the owner or their agent at their last known address, or by
197 any other method as the Court may direct, and shall be posted in a conspicuous place upon the rental
198 property in question; and
199 “(B) Transmitted to DC Water.
200 “(3) A hearing on the show cause order shall be held no later than three business days after
201 its issuance or the first court day thereafter.
202 “(4) Prior to the show cause hearing:
7

203 “(A) Respondent may file an answer to the petition raising any appropriate
204 defenses, including any evidence that they have resolved the delinquency through payment or by entering
205 a payment plan, provided that any set-offs, counterclaims, or third-party claims shall not be grounds for
206 refusing to appoint a receiver; and
207 “(B) DC Water shall transmit to the Court the most recent billing statement for the
208 rental property that is the subject of the receivership petition.
209 “(5) If the Court finds, by a preponderance of the evidence, that the owner’s account with
210 DC Water remains delinquent, the Court shall appoint a receiver to collect from the tenants of that rental
211 property any rental payments owed.
212 “(c)(1) A receiver appointed pursuant to subsection (b)(5) of this section may take any action it
213 deems necessary to collect all rental payments for use and occupancy from the tenants of the rental property
214 in lieu of the owner or their agent.
215 “(2) The Court may sua sponte or upon request by the receiver:
216 “(A) Impose a binding payment plan on the respondent; or
217 “(B) Appoint the receiver as the trustee of any escrow account or other funds into
218 which rental payments are deposited.
219 “(3) The receiver shall deposit any rental payments collected from tenants of the rental
220 property into an escrow account for which the receiver has been appointed by trustee as described in
221 paragraph (2)(B) of this subsection.
222 “(3)(A) The receiver shall pay DC Water for water and sewer services provided to the
223 rental property using money from the escrow account.
224 “(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the Court may:
225 “(i) Allow the receiver to expend up to 20% of the rental payments
226 collected from tenants for the operation and maintenance of, or improvements to, the rental property; or
227 “(ii) Require that the receiver equitably apportion payments to any other
228 person or entity to whom the owner is indebted and with respect to which any court has appointed a receiver,
8

229 including any electric company, electricity supplier, or natural gas supplier as described in section 4 of the
230 Prohibition of Electric and Gas Utility Service Terminations to Master-Metered Apartment Buildings Act
231 of 1980, effective September 13, 1980 (D.C. Law 3-94; D.C. Official Code § 42–3303).
232 “(4) The owner or their agent shall be liable for the reasonable fees and costs determined
233 by the Court to be owed to the receiver, which the receiver may recover from the escrow account for which
234 the receiver serves as trustee.
235 “(5) Any money remaining after the receiver makes the payments described in paragraph
236 (3) of this subsection and recovers fees and costs as described in paragraph (4) of this subsection shall be
237 transferred to the owner or their agent.
238 “(6) The Court may require the receiver to provide an accounting of the escrow account or
239 other components of the receivership.
240 “(c) Any receivership established pursuant to this section shall be terminated by the Court upon a
241 finding that:
242 “(1) The delinquency which was the subject of the original petition has been resolved;
243 “(2) All tenants have entered into an agreement with DC Water to receive service in their
244 own names; or
245 “(3) The rental property has been sold and the new owner has assumed liability for
246 prospective service supplied by DC Water.
247 “(d) Nothing in this section shall prevent the Mayor, DC Water, or a tenant from pursuing any other
248 appropriate action or remedy at law or equity against the owner of the rental property or their agent.
249 “(e) Any owner, agent, lessor, or manager who collects or attempts to collect a rental payment from
250 a tenant of the rental property subject to an order appointing a receiver pursuant to this section shall be
251 found to be in contempt of court, after due notice and hearing.
252 “(f) If the tenant or DC Water prevails in an action to appoint a receiver brought under this section,
253 the court shall award costs and reasonable attorney’s fees.
9

254 “(g) An owner, agent, lessor, or manager of a structure or property that is placed in receivership
255 pursuant to this section shall not service debt owed to themselves or another structure, property, or entity
256 in which the owner or owners have a beneficial interest.”.
257 (f) Section 101(a) (D.C. Official Code § 34–2407.02(a)) is amended to read as follows:
258 “(a)(1)(A) DC Water may initiate a lien proceeding against any property for which the owner’s
259 account has been deemed delinquent by filing a lien request with the Recorder of Deeds.
260 “(B) DC Water shall not initiate a lien as described in paragraph (1) of this
261 subsection unless:
262 “(i) At least 60 days have elapsed from the determination of delinquency
263 as described in section 103(c) of this act;
264 “(ii) The outstanding charges for the property exceed $25,000; and
265 “(iii) DC Water has provided the owner with notice of its intent to initiate
266 a lien proceeding against the owner no less than 30 days prior to DC Water’s filing of a certificate of
267 delinquency.
268 “(C) A lien request shall include:
269 “(i) The date on which the account for the property was deemed delinquent
270 pursuant to section 103(c);
271 “(ii) The account’s current outstanding balance;
272 “(iii) A summary of any prior attempts to resolve the delinquent account
273 with the owner; and
274 “(iv) A copy of the notice provided to the owner of DC Water’s intent to
275 initiate a lien proceeding against the owner.
276 “(2) The Recorder of Deeds shall approve a lien request filed by DC Water that meets the
277 requirements of this section.
10

278 “(3)(A) If the Recorder of Deeds approves of a lien request as described in paragraph (2)
279 of this subsection, the Recorder of Deeds shall place a continuing lien against the real property and show
280 the amount of unpaid charges for District water and sanitary sewer services.
281 “(B) The continuing lien shall be for the current balance of all unpaid water and
282 sewer service charges, penalties, interest, and administrative costs owed by the owner.
283 “(4) If the owner’s account remains delinquent for more than 90 days after the Record of
284 Deeds’ approval of the lien request, DC Water may seek enforcement of the lien in the same manner that
285 real property tax liens are enforced pursuant to Chapter 13 and Subchapter IV of Chapter 13A of Title 47.
286 “(5)(A) If the owner’s account remains delinquent for more than 180 days after the Record
287 of Deeds’ approval of the lien request and the outstanding charges for the property exceed $75,000, the real
288 property may be sold at a tax sale in accordance with the provisions for the sale of property for delinquent
289 real property taxes pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 47.
290 “(B) Any real property sold for unpaid water and sanitary sewer service charges is
291 not redeemed by the owner within 180 days from the date of sale, including payment of 2% interest for
292 each month until the property is redeemed, the Mayor shall furnish a deed to the purchaser or holder of the
293 certificate of sale in accordance with § 47-1304.
294 “(6) Any proceeds from an enforcement action taken pursuant to paragraph (4) of this
295 subsection or any tax sale of real property as described in paragraph (5) of this subsection shall be
296 transmitted to DC Water to satisfy the owner’s outstanding charges.
297 “(7) If an owner whose property is subject to a lien resolves all outstanding charges, DC
298 Water shall request, no later than five business days from the owner’s resolution of outstanding charges,
299 that the Recorder of Deeds remove the lien from the owner’s property.
300 “(8) The Recorder of Deeds shall, no later than three business days after receipt of a request
301 to remove a lien from the owner’s property as described in paragraph (7) of this subsection, remove said
302 lien.
303 (g) Section 103 (D.C. Official Code § 34–2407.01) is amended to read follows:
11

304 “Sec. 103. Billing; delinquent accounts; notice to District agencies; disconnection of service for
305 delinquency.
306 “(a)(1) DC Water shall, for the most recent period of service, issue a bill to the responsible party,
307 as that term is defined in section 1801(6), that itemizes all charges, fees, and credits.
308 “(2) DC Water shall not require, for any bill issued pursuant to paragraph (1) of this
309 subsection, payment by the responsible party sooner than 30 calendar days after issuance of the bill.
310 “(b)(1) If after 30 days have elapsed from issuance of the bill, full payment has not been made on
311 the bill, or the responsible party has not enrolled in a payment plan or disputed the bill as described in
312 section 216(f)(1) of the Water and Sewer Authority Establishment and Department of Public Works
313 Reorganization Act of 1996, effective April 18, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-111; D.C. Official Code § 34–
314 2202.16(f)(1)), DC Water shall send notice to the owner that:
315 “(A) The account for the property is past due;
316 “(B) Failure to resolve the past due account by paying the full amount or entering
317 into a payment plan will result in the account being deemed delinquent;
318 “(C) Once the account is deemed delinquent, DC Water is authorized to terminate
319 service as described in subsection (e); and
320 “(D) Assistance may be sought through the Office of People’s Counsel (“OPC”),
321 the Office of the Tenant Advocate (“OTA”), and any other entity that DC Water ascertains may be a
322 resource to the responsible party
323 “(2) The notice required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be developed in
324 consultation with OTA and OPC, and sent to the responsible party’s address of record via first class mail.
325 “(c)(1) If full payment has not been made, or the responsible party has not entered into a payment
326 plan after 30 days have elapsed from issuance of the notice described in subsection (b), DC Water shall
327 deem the responsible party’s account delinquent and send notice to the owner stating:
328 “(A) That the account has been deemed delinquent;
329 “(B) The amount due; and
12

330 “(C) That DC Water is authorized to terminate service as described in subsection
331 (e).
332 “(2) The notice required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall, no more than five
333 business days after deeming the responsible party’s account delinquent, be:
334 “(A) Sent to the responsible party’s address of record via first class mail;
335 “(B) For any multi-unit property occupied by an owner-occupant or any rental
336 property occupied by a tenant, posted at each entry to the affected multi-unit building or rental property;
337 and:
338 “(i) Posted each affected unit within the multi-unit building or rental
339 property, if there is public access to each unit; or
340 “(ii) Mailed to each unit within the rental property occupied by a tenant or
341 owner-occupant.
342 “(3) The notice required by paragraph (1) of this subsection shall be developed in
343 consultation with the Office of the Tenant Advocate (“OTA”) and the Office of People’s Counsel (“OPC”).
344 “(d)(1) If the account belonging to an owner or unit owners’ association for a rental property that
345 is occupied by a tenant or owner-occupant is deemed delinquent pursuant to this section, DC Water shall,
346 within five business days, notify the Department of Buildings (“DOB”), the Department of Licensing and
347 Consumer Protection (“DLCP”), Department on Disability Services (“DDS”), the Department of Aging
348 and Community Living (“DACL”) the Office of the Attorney General (“OAG”), OPC, and OTA of the
349 owner’s delinquency, including:
350 “(A) The name of the owner;
351 “(B) The address for which the account is delinquent;
352 “(C) The amount owed by owner;
353 “(D) The total number of days or months the owner’s account has been delinquent,
354 including any time the owner was enrolled in a payment plan with which the owner failed to comply; and
13

355 “(E) The earliest date by which DC Water may disconnect water and sewer service
356 under the notice requirements of section 103(e) of this act.
357 “(e) Upon receipt of the information from DC Water required by subsection (d)(1):
358 “(1) DACL shall:
359 “(A) Immediately notify DC Water if it believes that an individual 65 years of age
360 or older resides in the rental property or multi-unit building; and
361 “(B) Directly engage the resident to confirm their age and offer any appropriate
362 supports or services.
363 “(2) DDS shall:
364 “(A) Immediately notify DC Water if it believes that a person with a disability
365 resides in the rental property or multi-unit building; and
366 “(B) Directly engage the resident to confirm their disability and offer any
367 appropriate supports or services.
368 “(3) DOB and DLCP shall keep a record of the delinquency for the purposes of enforcing
369 section 3(a)(5) of the Clean Hands Before Receiving a License or Permit Act of 1996, effective May 11,
370 1996 (D.C. Law 11-118; D.C. Official Code § 47–2862(a)(5)).
371 “(f)(1) DC Water may terminate water service to any building, property, or location only if the
372 responsible party’s account has been deemed delinquent pursuant to this section.
373 “(2) After an account has been deemed delinquent pursuant to this section, DC Water is
374 authorized to terminate service no sooner than:
375 “(A) 60 days after the account has been deemed delinquent pursuant to this section,
376 for any property occupied by the owner, or any tenant or owner-occupant that receives service in their own
377 name; or
378 “(B) 90 days after the account has been deemed delinquent pursuant to this section,
379 for any tenant or owner-occupant who does not receive service in their own name.
14

380 “(C) 120 days after the account has been deemed delinquent pursuant to this
381 section, for any tenant or owner-occupant who DACL has determined to be a person 65 years of age or
382 older or who DDS has determined to be a person with a disability.
383 “(3) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of this subsection, for any rental property to which DC
384 Water cannot terminate water and sewer service on a unit-by-unit basis, DC Water is authorized to terminate
385 service no sooner than 100 days after the account has been deemed delinquent pursuant to this section, for
386 any tenant or owner-occupant who does not receive service in their own name.
387 “(g)(1) Notwithstanding any other law, DC Water shall not shut off residential water or sewage
388 service due to the responsible party’s delinquent account during any day preceding, and any day of, a
389 forecast of extreme temperature or if the forecast of extreme temperature precedes a holiday or weekend
390 day, on any day during the holiday or weekend.
391 “(2) For the purposes of this subsection, the term “forecast of extreme temperature” means
392 a National Weather Service (“NWS”) forecast for the District of Columbia during any time of day of:
393 “(A) 95 degrees Fahrenheit or above during any time of the day, based on the NWS
394 actual temperature forecasts or the NWS heat and wind chill indices, whichever is higher; or
395 “(B) 32 degrees Fahrenheit or below during any time of the day, based on the NWS
396 actual temperature forecasts or the NWS heat and wind chill indices, whichever is lower.
397 “(h) DC Water shall submit on the 10th day of each month, the following information to the Council,
398 the Office of the Attorney General, the Office of People’s Counsel, and the Office of the Tenant Advocate
399 for the preceding month:
400 “(1) The number of properties that received a notice of disconnection, including a separate
401 count of the number of multi-unit residential properties with the owner as the responsible party that received
402 a notice of disconnection;
403 “(2) Of those properties that were issued a notice, the number of properties that experienced
404 a disconnection;
15

405 “(3) Of those properties that experienced a disconnection, the number of properties that
406 had service restored;
407 “(4) The number of properties that entered into a payment plan;
408 “(5) The number of properties that have had bill payment assumed by the tenants through
409 a tenant association or by direct agreement with tenants;
410 “(6) The number of properties that have been placed in receivership; and
411 “(7) The number of properties for which DC Water has requested a lien.
412 “(i) DC Water shall provide translations of the notices required under subsections (b)(1) and (c)(1)
413 of this section in any non-English language spoken by a limited or no-English proficient population that
414 constitutes 3% or 500 individuals, whichever is less, of the population served or encountered at the
415 property.”.
416 Sec. 3. Section 216 of the Water and Sewer Authority Establishment and Department of Public
417 Works Reorganization Act of 1996, effective April 18, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-111; D.C. Official Code § 34-
418 2202.16), is amended as follows:
419 (a) Subsection (d) is amended to read as follows:
420 “(d) The Authority may impose additional charges and penalties for late payment of bills
421 not exceeding a charge of 10% for any charges or bills remaining unpaid for more than 30 days, and a
422 penalty at the rate of 1% per month compounded monthly for any charges or bills that remain unpaid for
423 more than 60 days.”.
424 (b) Subsection (e) is repealed.
425 (c) Subsection (f) is amended to read as follows:
426 “(f)(1) A responsible party, as that term is defined in section 1801(6) of the District of Columbia
427 Public Works Act of 1954, effective May 18, 1954 (68 Stat. 101; D.C. Official Code § 34–2301(6)), may
428 dispute a bill issued to them by the Authority, provided that the responsible party transmits the dispute to
429 the Authority in writing, through an online application, or by telephone no later than 30 days after rendition
16

430 of the bill being disputed as described in section 103(a)(1) of the District of Columbia Public Works Act of
431 1954, effective May 18, 1954 (68 Stat. 101; D.C. Official Code § 34–2407.01).
432 “(2) If a residential customer's dispute meets the requirements of this subsection, the
433 Authority shall suspend the residential customer's obligation to pay the disputed bill until the customer has
434 received the result of the Authority's investigation of the dispute in writing or by email.
435 “(3) The Authority shall include on the front of a residential customers' bill the specific
436 date by which a dispute must be communicated to the Authority by a responsible party, or someone acting
437 on behalf of the responsible party.
438 “(4) If a responsible party disputes a bill in accordance with the requirements of this
439 subsection, the Authority shall review:
440 “(A) The bill being disputed;
441 “(B) Any bill issued between the date the responsible party made their dispute
442 pursuant to paragraph (1) and the resolution of that challenge; and
443 “(C) The two bills preceding the bill being disputed.
444 “(5)(A) The Authority shall respond to a dispute made in accordance with this subsection
445 no later than 30 calendar days from the date it was received.”.
446 Sec. 5. Grants for legal assistance for water service ratepayers.
447 (a) The Director of the Department of Energy and Environment (“Director”) may issue grants to
448 any eligible nonprofit organization or private entity for the provision of pro bono legal services to DC Water
449 ratepayers related to water and sewer service disconnection, petitions for receivership, or the initiation of a
450 lien for water charges.
451 (b) The Director, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, may issue rules to implement this
452 section.
453 Sec. 6. Regulations.
454 (a)(1) No later than 90 days after the effective date of this act, DC Water shall issue new regulations
455 that conform to the requirements of this act.
17

456 (2) DC Water shall submit the proposed regulations to the Council for a 45-day period of
457 review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. The Council may approve
458 the proposed regulations in whole or in part. If the Council does not disapprove the proposed regulations
459 within this 45-day period, the regulations shall be deemed approved.
460 Section 7. Fiscal impact statement.
461 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal impact
462 statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved October 16,
463 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
464 Sec. 7. Applicability.
465 Section 3 shall apply as of April 18, 1996.
466 Sec. 8. Effective date.
467 This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
468 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as provided in
469 section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813;
470 D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of Columbia Register.
18